West Virginia, session 2026, SB332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Examiners in Counseling. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-31-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners in Counseling to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Examiners in Counseling (licensing, 27 CSR 01), is authorized.